Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
Article 7 Registration of Organizations Providing Services to Runaway and Homeless Youth

Effective date. —

This article became effective July 1, 2011.

Editor’s notes.

This article, consisting of Code Sections 49-5-160 through 49-5-164, formerly pertained to the commission on children and youth.
The former article was based on Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1, and Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 31, and was repealed by Ga. L. 1991, p. 435, § 19, effective July 1, 1991.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 470, § 1/SB 94, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Runaway Youth Safety Act.’ ”

Administrative rules and regulations.

Program for the Education of Homeless Children and Youth/Education of Homeless Children and Youth Subgrants, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Education, Grant Programs, § 160-1-4-.59.

49-5-160.
Definitions; qualifications.

As used in this article, the term:

“Licensed” means an individual who has been licensed pursuant to Chapter 10A, 26, 34, or 39 of Title 43.

“Organization” means a nonprofit charitable organization which is exempt from taxation under the provisions of Section 501(c)(3) of the United States Internal Revenue Code, which:

Serves children who have run away or children who are homeless;

Has qualified staff on duty at all hours the organization is open for service; and

Employs at least one individual who is licensed pursuant to Chapter 10A, 26, 34, or 39 of Title 43.

“Qualified staff” means having:

All staff who directly interact with children receive training on emergency evacuation procedures, service protocols, and the mandatory child abuse reporting requirements set forth in Code Section 19-7-5; and

All staff have had a criminal record check conducted in accordance with Article 5 of this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-160

, enacted by Ga. L. 2011, p. 470, § 4/SB 94.

49-5-161.
Registration and form required; fee; issuance of certificate.

On and after July 1, 2011, all organizations shall register under this Code section by submitting a form to the department, upon forms furnished by the department. The form shall require the name, address, and telephone number of the organization and emergency contact information.

A registrant shall be required to pay an annual registration fee of $25.00.

Upon receipt of an application for registration, payment of the registration fees, and presentation by the applicant of evidence that the organization meets the qualifications prescribed by Code Section 49-4-162, the department shall issue such organization a registration certificate valid for one year.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-161

, enacted by Ga. L. 2011, p. 470, § 4/SB 94.

49-5-162.
Policies; qualified staff; proof of liability coverage.

The department shall require organizations to have reasonable:

Written policies and procedures for admission, intake, and record keeping;

Written policies regarding treatment and referrals for mental, physical, and emotional health;

Written policies for reports of actual or alleged injuries at an organization’s premises; and

Proof of having qualified staff.

The department shall require that organizations:

Photograph all minors considered for admission by the organization;

Have proof of liability insurance coverage sufficient to protect the clients of the organization’s facility; and

Provide a copy of its registration to the sheriff of the county in which the organization operates a facility, and the sheriff shall distribute such registration to all appropriate law enforcement agencies within the county.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-162

, enacted by Ga. L. 2011, p. 470, § 4/SB 94.

49-5-163.
Display of registration; inspection of facilities; investigation.

A registered organization shall prominently display its registration at some location near the entrance of the premises of such organization that is open to view by the public.

The department shall be given the right to periodically inspect the facilities of registered organizations. The department shall have right of entrance, privilege of inspection, and right of access to all children under the care and control of the organization.

If any flagrant abuses, derelictions, or deficiencies are made known to the department or its duly authorized agents during their inspection of any organization or if, at any time, such are reported to the department, the department shall immediately investigate such matters and take such action as conditions may require.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-163

, enacted by Ga. L. 2011, p. 470, § 4/SB 94.

49-5-164.
Registered organization not exempt.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to exempt a registered organization from the requirements of Code Section 49-5-12 for minors who are present with a service provider longer than 72 hours after the minor has accepted services.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-164

, enacted by Ga. L. 2011, p. 470, § 4/SB 94.